Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-176
Answer; filing; contents.

Within seven days after the return day of such summons the party at interest upon whom the same is served shall file an answer to such petition, which shall admit or deny the substantial averments of the petition, and shall state the contention of the defendant with reference to the matters in dispute as disclosed by the petition.

Laws 1935, c. 57, § 13, p. 193;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-174;

R.S.1943, § 48-176;

Laws 1978, LB 649, § 7.

Answer is required to state the contention of the defendant with respect to the matters in dispute. Shada v. Whitney, 172 Neb. 220, 109 N.W.2d 167 (1961).

Evidence of second injury was admissible under general denial. Towner v. Western Contracting Corp., 164 Neb. 235, 82 N.W.2d 253 (1957).